src/derivation/crk-drv.lexc
@P.infl.NA-2@maskwamiy-:@P.infl.NA-2@maskwamiy I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-3@maskêkw-:@P.infl.NI-3@maskêkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@maskêkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@maskêkw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@mastaw:@P.infl.IPC@mastaw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPV@mastâ-:@P.infl.IPV@mastâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@masân-:@P.infl.NA-1@masân I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@masân-:@P.infl.NONTERM@masân I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mat-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mat I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-1@matokahp-:@P.infl.NI-1@matokahp I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@matotisi-:@P.infl.VAI-v@matotisi I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-1@matotisân-:@P.infl.NI-1@matotisân I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@matotisân-:@P.infl.NONTERM@matotisân I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@matwân:@P.infl.IPC@matwân I2M ;
@P.infl.IPV@matwê-:@P.infl.IPV@matwê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@matwê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@matwê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@matâwisi-:@P.infl.NONTERM@matâwisi I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@matâwisi-:@P.infl.VAI-v@matâwisi I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@mawapi-:@P.infl.VAI-v@mawapi I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mawasakw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mawasakw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mawimo-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mawimo I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@mawimo-:@P.infl.VAI-v@mawimo I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mawinê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mawinê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mawiso-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mawiso I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mawisw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mawisw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mawîhk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mawîhk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mayak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mayak I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@mayaw:@P.infl.IPC@mayaw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mayaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mayaw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@maywês:@P.infl.IPC@maywês I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@maýâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@maýâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@micim-:@P.infl.NONTERM@micim I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@micimw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@micimw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miciyawê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miciyawê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mihc-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mihc I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mihcâskw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mihcâskw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mihcê(t)-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mihcê I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@mihcêt-:@P.infl.IPC@mihcêt I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mihcêt-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mihcêt I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mihcêtw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mihcêtw I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-1@mihk-:@P.infl.NI-1@mihk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mihk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mihk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mihkawak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mihkawak I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@mihkinâhkw-:@P.infl.NA-3@mihkinâhkw I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@mihko:@P.infl.VAI-v@mihko I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-4w@mihkw-:@P.infl.NI-4w@mihkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mihkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mihkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-4@miht-:@P.infl.NI-4@miht I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miht I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mihtam-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mihtam I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mihtikw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mihtikw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mihtim-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mihtim I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-1@mihtoT-:@P.infl.NI-1@mihtoT I2M ;
@P.infl.IPV@mihýawê-:@P.infl.IPV@mihýawê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mihýawê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mihýawê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mik-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mik I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mikisimo-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mikisimo I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@mikisiw-:@P.infl.NA-2@mikisiw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mikisiw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mikisiw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mikosiskât-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mikosiskât I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mikoskât-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mikoskât I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mimikw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mimikw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@min-:@P.infl.NONTERM@min I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mina-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mina I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@minahikw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@minahikw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@minaho-:@P.infl.NONTERM@minaho I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@minaho-:@P.infl.VAI-v@minaho I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@minihkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@minihkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@minihkwê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@minihkwê I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-3@ministikw-:@P.infl.NI-3@ministikw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@ministikw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ministikw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mis-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mis I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@misaht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@misaht I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@misakâmê-:@P.infl.IPC@misakâmê I2M ;
@P.infl.IPV@misakâmê-:@P.infl.IPV@misakâmê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@misakâmê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@misakâmê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@misam-:@P.infl.NONTERM@misam I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@misawât-:@P.infl.IPC@misawât I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@misi-:@P.infl.NONTERM@misi I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@misicâhkw-:@P.infl.NA-3@misicâhkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@misihkêmo-:@P.infl.NONTERM@misihkêmo I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@misikiti-:@P.infl.NONTERM@misikiti I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@misin-:@P.infl.NONTERM@misin I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@misipot-:@P.infl.NONTERM@misipot I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@misisâhkw-:@P.infl.NA-3@misisâhkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@misiwan-:@P.infl.NONTERM@misiwan I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@misiwanât-:@P.infl.NONTERM@misiwanât I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@misiwê-:@P.infl.IPC@misiwê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@misiwê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@misiwê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@misiy-:@P.infl.NONTERM@misiy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@misk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@misk I2M ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@misk-:@P.infl.VTI-1@misk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miskaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miskaw I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-2@miskaw-:@P.infl.VTA-2@miskaw I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@miskinâhkw-:@P.infl.NA-3@miskinâhkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miskocê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miskocê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miskw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miskw I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@miskwamiy-:@P.infl.NA-2@miskwamiy I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miskwamiy-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miskwamiy I2M ;
@P.infl.VII-n@mispon-:@P.infl.VII-n@mispon I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mispw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mispw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mist-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mist I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mistah-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mistah I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@mistanaskw-:@P.infl.NA-3@mistanaskw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mistanaskw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mistanaskw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@mistikw-:@P.infl.IPC@mistikw I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@mistikw-:@P.infl.NA-3@mistikw I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-3@mistikw-:@P.infl.NI-3@mistikw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mistikw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mistikw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@misw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@misw I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-3@misw-:@P.infl.VTA-3@misw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@misâskwatw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@misâskwatw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@misî-:@P.infl.NONTERM@misî I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mitim-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mitim I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@mitim-:@P.infl.VAI-v@mitim I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mitimêý-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mitimêý I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miton-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miton I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mitât-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mitât I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mitâtaht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mitâtaht I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@mitâtahtw-:@P.infl.IPC@mitâtahtw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mitâtahtw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mitâtahtw I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@mitêw-:@P.infl.NA-2@mitêw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mitêw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mitêw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@miyamâc:@P.infl.IPC@miyamâc I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miyaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miyaw I2M ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@miyân-:@P.infl.VTI-1@miyân I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miý(aw)ês-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miýês I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-4@miý-:@P.infl.NI-4@miý I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miý-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miý I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@miý-:@P.infl.VTA-1@miý I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@miýamâc:@P.infl.IPC@miýamâc I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miýaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miýaw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miýawât-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miýawât I2M ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@miýawât-:@P.infl.VTI-1@miýawât I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miýawê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miýawê I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@miýay-:@P.infl.NA-2@miýay I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miýimâw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miýimâw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miýw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miýw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miýâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miýâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miýâhkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miýâhkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miýâkoho-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miýâkoho I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miýâkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miýâkw I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@miýâm-:@P.infl.VTA-1@miýâm I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miýês-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miýês I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miýêst-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miýêst I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miýêstaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miýêstaw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@miýêstawân-:@P.infl.NONTERM@miýêstawân I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@miýêstawê-:@P.infl.VAI-v@miýêstawê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mohci-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mohci I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@mohkit-:@P.infl.VAI-v@mohkit I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@mohkâhâsiw-:@P.infl.NA-2@mohkâhâsiw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@moht-:@P.infl.IPC@moht I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@moht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@moht I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-2@mohtêw-:@P.infl.NA-2@mohtêw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mohtêw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mohtêw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mosaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mosaw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@most-:@P.infl.NONTERM@most I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mostos-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mostos I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-3@mostosw-:@P.infl.NA-3@mostosw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mostosw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mostosw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mostâpêk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mostâpêk I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@mosê-:@P.infl.IPC@mosê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mosê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mosê I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-2@motay-:@P.infl.NI-2@motay I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mow-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mow I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@mow-:@P.infl.VTA-1@mow I2M ;
@P.infl.IPV@mwayî:@P.infl.IPV@mwayî I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mwâT-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mwâT I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-4w@mwâkw-:@P.infl.NA-4w@mwâkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mwâkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mwâkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mwêht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mwêht I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mwês-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mwês I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mwêst-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mwêst I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@mwêstas:@P.infl.IPC@mwêstas I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mwêstas:@P.infl.NONTERM@mwêstas I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mwêstâT-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mwêstâT I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mwêstât-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mwêstât I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâcî-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâcî I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@mâcî-:@P.infl.VAI-v@mâcî I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâh-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâh I2M ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@mâh-:@P.infl.VTI-1@mâh I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâhcikw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâhcikw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâhkê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâhkê I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâhpin-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâhpin I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâht I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâhtakw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâhtakw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâhtâh-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâhtâh I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâhtâw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâhtâw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâhâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâhâ I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@mâka:@P.infl.IPC@mâka I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-4w@mâkw-:@P.infl.NA-4w@mâkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâkw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâm-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâm I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâmaskâ(s)-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâmaskâ I2M ;
@P.infl.VTA-4@mâmaskâT-:@P.infl.VTA-4@mâmaskâT I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@mâmaskât-:@P.infl.IPC@mâmaskât I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâmaskât-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâmaskât I2M ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@mâmaskât-:@P.infl.VTI-1@mâmaskât I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@mâmaw-:@P.infl.IPC@mâmaw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâmaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâmaw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâmiskô-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâmiskô I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâmiton-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâmiton I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâmiýwâkât-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâmiýwâkât I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@mâmâsîs:@P.infl.IPC@mâmâsîs I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@mâmâwat-:@P.infl.IPC@mâmâwat I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâmâwat-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâmâwat I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mân-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mân I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@mâna:@P.infl.IPC@mâna I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâninâkiskw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâninâkiskw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâs-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâs I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-3@mâsikîskw-:@P.infl.NI-3@mâsikîskw I2M ;
@P.infl.NI-1@mâsk-:@P.infl.NI-1@mâsk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâsk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâsk I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@mâskôt-:@P.infl.IPC@mâskôt I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mât-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mât I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâtah-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâtah I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâtin-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâtin I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâto-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâto I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@mâto-:@P.infl.VAI-v@mâto I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâtâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâtâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâtâpw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâtâpw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâwasakw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâwasakw I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@mâwat-:@P.infl.IPC@mâwat I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâwat-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâwat I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâý-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâý I2M ;
@P.infl.VAI-n@mâý-:@P.infl.VAI-n@mâý I2M ;
@P.infl.VII-v@mâý-:@P.infl.VII-v@mâý I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâýakw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâýakw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mâýât-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mâýât I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mêcimw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mêcimw I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mêk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mêk I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mêki-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mêki I2M ;
@P.infl.IPC@mêkwa-:@P.infl.IPC@mêkwa I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mêkwa-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mêkwa I2M ;
@P.infl.NA-1@mêkwan-:@P.infl.NA-1@mêkwan I2M ;
@P.infl.IPV@mêkwâ-:@P.infl.IPV@mêkwâ I2M ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@mêkwâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@mêkwâ I2M ;
